Vermont, session 2025-2026, H589.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 526 is added to read:
§ 526. ACTION ARISING OUT OF IMPROVEMENTS TO REAL
PROPERTY; STATUTE OF REPOSE
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a civil action for personal
injury or property damages arising out of a deficiency in the creation of an
improvement to real property, including the design, planning, contract
administration, supervision, or construction of the improvement, shall be
brought within six years after substantial completion of the improvement.
VT LEG #385570 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.589
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to actions involving
fraudulent misrepresentations or to actions involving the fraudulent
concealment of material facts upon which a claim might be based, which are
governed by section 555 of this title.
(c) As used in this section, “substantial completion” means that
construction is sufficiently complete so that an improvement may be utilized
by its owner or lawful possessor for the purposes intended. In the case of a
phased project with more than one substantial completion date, the six-year
period of limitations for actions involving systems designed to serve the entire
project shall begin at the substantial completion of each phase.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385570 v.1